District of Columbia statutes.
47-340.34

District officials.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided § 47-340.33, the elected or appointed officials, officers, employees, or agents of the District shall not be liable personally for the payment of the bonds or be subject to any personal liability by reason of the issuance of the bonds, or for any representations, warranties, covenants, obligations, or agreements of the District contained in this subchapter, the bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents.

(b)

The signature, countersignature, facsimile signature, or facsimile countersignature of any official appearing on the bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes notwithstanding the fact that the individual signatory ceases to hold that office before delivery of the bonds, the Financing Documents, or the Closing Documents.

(c)

To the extent permitted by law, the Mayor may delegate to any Authorized Delegate the performance of any act authorized to be performed by the Mayor under this subchapter.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-254, § 2(b), 55 DCR 9275